District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.03

Supplemental principles of law and equity.

Unless displaced by a provision of this chapter, the principles of law and equity shall supplement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 4, 61 DCR 13083

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.